Hawaii statutes.
§580-7 Examination of parties to prevent
collusion. Upon the hearing of any complaint for a divorce or separation,
the court may examine either or both of the parties, upon oath, in order to
prevent collusion. [CC 1859, §1341; am L 1903, c 22, §2; RL 1925, §2992; RL
1935, §4489; RL 1945, §12241; RL 1955, §324-66; HRS §580-7; am L 1973, c 211,
§5(c)]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next